test/src/morphology/Det-Dem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Determiner demonstrative proxal - тэдт:
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom: тэдт
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen: тэнн
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc: тэнн
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill: тэз
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Loc: тэсьт
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Com: тэйн
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Abe: тэннха
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Sg+Ess: тэйн
##    ке̄#Par?? see field notes
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom: тэгк
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen: тэйт
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc: тэйт
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill: тэйт
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Loc: тэйнэнҍ
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Com: тэйтгуэйм
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Abe: тэйтха
    тэдт+Det+Dem+Pl+Ess: тэйнэнҍ


  Determiner demonstrative distal - тудт:
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Nom: тудт
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Gen: тунн
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Acc: тунн
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Ill: туз
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Loc: тусьт
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Com: туйн
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Abe: туннха
    тудт+Det+Dem+Sg+Ess: туйн
##    ке̄#Par?? see field notes
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Nom: тугк
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Gen: туйт
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Acc: туйт
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Ill: туйт
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Loc: туйнэнҍ
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Com: туйтгуэйм
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Abe: туйтха
    тудт+Det+Dem+Pl+Ess: туйнэнҍ


#MR: Deduced from its actual use in real texts, the common analysis of тэдта / тэгка as Dem+Nom (cf. Kuruč 1985, Sammallahti 1991, Šaršina 2008) is probably wrong. I am here following Kert 1971. тэдта / тэгка should rather be analyzed as 3rd person inanimate pronouns (cf. Finnish se, North Sámi dat).
